Tennessee, session 114, HB1092.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 9-4-5404, is amended by deleting
"February 1" and substituting instead "March 1".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 9-4-5406, is amended by deleting
"February 1" and substituting instead "March 1".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1092
002781
- 1 -